Armenian/Dictionaries/arm_spellcheck_dict/arm_spellcheck_dict.aff
SET UTF-8
FLAG  UTF-8
LANG HY_AM
IGNORE ՞՛։․՜
WORDCHARS ՞

TRY էթփձջւևրչճժքոեռտըւիօպխծասդֆգհյկլշզղցվբնմԷԹՓՁՋՒևՐՉՃԺՔՈԵՌՏԸՒԻՕՊԽԾԱՍԴՖԳՀՅԿԼՇԶՂՑՎԲՆՄ՞
KEY էթփձջւևրչճժ|քոեռտըւիօպ|ասդֆգհյկլշ|շզղցվբնմ|քաո|սաք|ոսե|դսղ|դես|սը|եդռ|ֆդց|դղ|ռֆտ|գֆվ|ֆց|տգը|զաղ|հգբ|գվ|ըհւ|յհն|հբ|ւյի|կյմ|յն|յմ|իկօ|լկմ|յի|զղ

REP 20
REP ր ռ
REP ռ ր
REP օ ո
REP ո օ
REP ե է
REP է ե
REP դ տ
REP տ դ
REP տ թ
REP թ տ
REP ն մ
REP մ ն
REP և եվ
REP եվ և
REP և եւ
REP եւ և
REP բ պ
REP պ բ
REP պ փ
REP փ պ

SFX A Y 1
SFX A 0 ը .

SFX H Y 1
SFX H 0 ից/NO .

PFX L Y 1
PFX L 0 չ .

SFX B Y 1
SFX B 0 ն .

SFX C Y 1
SFX C 0 ներ/HDEFGNOAB .

SFX D Y 1
SFX D 0 ի/NO .

SFX E Y 1
SFX E 0 ում/NO .

SFX F Y 1
SFX F 0 ով .

SFX G Y 1
SFX G 0 ին/AB .

SFX I Y 1
SFX I 0 ուց .

SFX J Y 1
SFX J 0 ու .

PFX K Y 1
PFX K 0 կ .

PFX M Y 1
PFX M 0 ան .

SFX N Y 1
SFX N 0 դ .

SFX O Y 1
SFX O 0 ս .

SFX V Y 28
SFX V ել ում ել
SFX V ալ ում ալ
SFX V ել վում ել
SFX V ալ ցվում ալ
SFX V ել եմ/K ել
SFX V ալ ամ/K ալ
SFX V ել ես/K ել
SFX V ալ աս/K ալ
SFX V ել ի/K ել
SFX V ալ ա/K ալ
SFX V ել ենք/K ել
SFX V ալ անք/K ալ
SFX V ել եք/K ել
SFX V ալ աք/K ալ
SFX V ել են/K ել
SFX V ալ ան/K ալ
SFX V ել եցի ել
SFX V ալ ացի ալ
SFX V ել եցիր ել
SFX V ալ ացիր ալ
SFX V ել եց ել
SFX V ալ աց ալ
SFX V ել եցինք ել
SFX V ալ ացինք ալ
SFX V ել եցիք ել
SFX V ալ ացիք ալ
SFX V ել եցին ել
SFX V ալ ացին ալ

SFX P Y 7
SFX P 0 ու .
SFX P 0 իս .
SFX P 0 ուց .
SFX P 0 ուն .
SFX P 0 իք/ABCNO .
SFX P 0 /AB .
SFX P 0 ով .
