Armenian/Dictionaries/arm_spellcheck_dict/arm_spellcheck_dict.dic
ադրբեջանցի/BC
ալիք/ACDH
ախուրյան/D
ական/ABCDEFH
ակկարոնացիներին/A
ակնկալիք/DF
ակտեր/ABDEF
աղ/ABDEFG
աղախնի/N
աղբոտել/J
աղջկան/ABFH
աման/ABCDFGHL
ամատունու/B
ամբար/CE
ամբարտավանություն/ACDFH
ամենք/N
ամրաշինություն/ACDFH
ամրի/BDG
ամրոց/ABCDEGH
այգ/ABDEG
այլաբանություն/ACDFH
այտուցվել/J
այրել/AFJL
այց/ABDF
անախորժություն/ACDFH
անաչառություն/ABCDFH
անգլիայի/B
անդամություն/ACDFH
անիծես/L
անկախություն/ACDFH
անկանոնություն/ACDFH
անկողնի/N
անհավատություն/ACDFH
անհատականություն/ACDFH
անմահություն/ACDFH
անմեղ/ABCDG
անոնի/B
անուշադիրություն/ACDFH
անպարտ/N
անվանարկել/J
անվեհերություն/ACDFH
անտակտություն/ACDFH
անտառապատ/E
աշխատակցություն/ACDFH
աշխատունակություն/ACDFHM
աշուղ/ABD
ապահովագրություն/ACDFH
ապահովեց/DGL
ապաքողարկել/J
ապստամբություն/ABCDFH
ապրանք/ABCD
առան/ADGL
առաջ/BGN
առաջարկ/ABCEFG
առաջացում/H
առատություն/ACDFH
առիթ/ABCDFH
առնեմ/L
առոգանել/J
առու/BD
ասբեստ/D
ասկաղոն/ABDEGH
ասորդան/A
ասուլիս/CDEH
ասված/L
աստղ/ADGH
ավազակություն/ACDFH
ավարտ/ADEGHM
ատենադպիր/AB
արաբկիր/AD
արագընթացություն/ACDFH
արարչի/N
արարք/ABCDFH
արգելակ/CEF
արգելակել/J
արեցինք/L
արժանապատվություն/ACDFH
արժեք/ACDM
արծրունու/B
արհեստականություն/ACDFH
արձագանք/ABCDEM
արձակեց/DGL
արմաղան/BDGH
արյուն/ABDFH
արոտ/C
արվել/J
արտահոս/E
արցունք/ABCDFM
արքայություն/ACDFH
արևելք/ADEH
արևու/N
աքիմաս/AD
բադ/ABDFG
բազմացրի/B
բաժան/DEM
բաժանել/ADFJ
բաղադրություն/ACDFH
բաղդադ/ADEH
բաղեղ/F
բան/N
բանալ/ADFG
բանասիրություն/ACDFH
բասեմաթի/B
բավական/GM
բավարար/EM
բավարարել/JL
բարեգթության/A
բարել/HJ
բարեհարմարություն/ACDFH
բարեպաշտություն/ACDFHM
բարերար/N
բարձրամտություն/ACDFH
բարձրավանդակ/ADEH
բաց/DEG
բացվածքճեղքել/J
բեհեզ/ABCDFH
բեմադրություն/ACDFH
բերեցիք/L
բերզելիի/B
բերրիությամբ/M
բխում/H
բծեր/AF
բնագավառ/ADE
բնականություն/ACDFH
բնակավայր/ABDFGHNO
բնակատեղ/BDGH
բոլոր/ABDFGHNO
բուռ/N
բուսաբանություն/ACDFH
բռնություն/ABCDFH
գազ/DFGH
գազիֆիկացնել/J
գալանթար/D
գահակալ/ACE
գաղտնապահություն/ACDFH
գանգված/A
գառ/ABCFH
գառնեցի/DG
գարուն/AB
գեղեցիկ/N
գետ/ABDEFGH
գեր/DEG
գիպասիստ/C
գիտակ/HM
գիտակցող/L
գլխարկ/ABDG
գյուլեր/A
գյուտ/AH
գնդեր/ABDEFGH
գնել/AFJ
գնեն/L
գնորդ/G
գոհաբանել/FJ
գոչ/DE
գոտի/BF
գործ/N
գործազրկություն/ACDFH
գործություն/ACDFHM
գումարես/L
գունեղություն/ACDFH
գրանցում/AF
գրաստ/ACDFGH
գրություն/ACDEFH
դագաղ/ACDEGH
դանդաղեցնել/J
դաշտեր/N
դառնա/BL
դառնություն/ACDFH
դասախոսություն/ACDFH
դաստիարակ/BCDEM
դատ/ABDEFG
դատարան/ABCDEFGH
դարձնությամբ/L
դեզ/AD
դերձակ/D
դիմաշարժություն/ACDFH
դիմացկուն/GM
դիտակետ/E
դյուրագրգրություն/ACDFH
դնգսել/J
դնել/AFJL
դողաց/G
դուստր/N
դր/DEG
դքսություն/ACDFH
եզերք/ADEFGH
եզրայի/B
ելդա/BN
եկած/ACHL
եղանակ/ABCDFG
եղբոր/N
եղիսաբեթ/ADG
եղնգաքար/D
երաշխավորություն/ACDFH
երգիծաբանություն/ACDFH
երեխա/BCDGHN
երթ/ABDEFGH
երթա/BL
երկարեց/DGL
երկբայելի/M
երկինք/ABCF
երկուս/N
երևաց/GL
զամբյուղ/ABDFH
զայրացնել/J
զար/ADFN
զարթնեց/DGL
զարհուրել/DFJ
զբոսաշրջիկություն/ACDFH
զգայունակ/M
զինաթափ/E
զինանշան/ABCD
զինվորականություն/ACDFH
զղջացած/L
զննել/AFJ
զոհաբերեց/G
զորապետ/CDFG
զորաջոկատի/B
զորքեր/ABDEFGH
զույգ/ADM
էղնիս/L
էֆեկտիվություն/ACDFH
ընդլայնվել/J
ընդունման/AL
ընդօրինակություն/ACDFH
ընթացք/ABCDEFGHNO
ընթրիք/ABDGH
ընչաքաղցություն/ACDFH
ընտրություն/ABCDFGH
թաթ/N
թատերաբեմ/ABEH
թարմություն/ACDFH
թարսիս/ADEH
թափանցիկ/M
թափել/AFJ
թափեց/DG
թափեցիր/L
թել/ABDFGHJ
թոնիր/N
թովչություն/ACDFH
թույլատրելիություն/ACDFH
թվագրված/L
թվարկ/E
թվարկություն/ACDFH
թրջվել/FJ
թևեր/ABDEFGH
ժամկետ/ABDEFHM
ժողովուրդ/NACD
ժուժկալ/M
ի/NOSUGGEST
իբրահիմ/AD
իկոնիա/B
ինչ/N
ինստիտուտ/ADE
ինքնատպագրություն/ACDFH
իշխեն/L
իսկական/AM
իտություն/ACDFH
իրավահավասարություն/ACDFH
իրատեսականություն/A
լարեց/G
լեզու/N
լիք/AB
լողաց/CE
լոյալ/M
լոր/N
լուծ/ABDE
լուծել/DFJ
լուծվող/L
լսվել/J
լրամշակման/A
լրբություն/ACDFH
լցվավ/L
խալ/DG
խաղարկություն/ACDFH
խանութ/ADEH
խելամիտ/M
խեղդամահություն/ACDFH
խծուծել/J
խմեր/L
խնամիություն/ACDFH
խնդիրք/N
խնկեր/ABDFGH
խոզ/ABDH
խոզաբուծություն/ACDFH
խոհ/E
խոյ/ABDFGH
խոշտանգեն/L
խորան/ABDEFGH
խորխ/N
խոց/ADEF
խուզ/DEH
խռմփացնել/FJ
խփեց/G
ծամածռություն/ACDFH
ծանրաբեռն/E
ծառ/ABDFGH
ծավալ/ABDEF
ծափահարություն/ACDFH
ծերացնել/J
ծերություն/ACDFH
ծխող/L
ծնոտ/CG
ծոց/N
ծուլություն/ACDFH
ծրագրեր/ABDEFG
կազմակերպ/DEM
կախարդանք/AH
կայացնությամբ/L
կանգառ/E
կանգուն/ADF
կանխագործել/J
կանոն/ABCDFHM
կանչ/ABDEFG
կանչեցիր/L
կաշխատի/B
կապերտ/C
կարա/BL
կարգապահ/M
կարգավորում/ACH
կարիաթարիմ/ADE
կարիք/ABDH
կափարիչ/ADFG
կեղծորեն/M
կեղտոտել/J
կենալ/ABFL
կերա/B
կերուխում/DF
կին/ABNO
կիսամյակ/E
կկայ/C
կյուրոս/AD
կնոջ/N
կողք/ADFGH
կոշտացնել/J
կոչ/ADEFG
կոռեկտ/M
կորդուք/ABDE
կորովի/B
կորցնեմ/L
կուզիկություն/ACDFH
կռվեց/G
կտուր/ABD
կրեն/L
կրկնության/A
հագուստ/N
հագուրդ/M
հագցնել/J
հակադրություն/ACDFH
հաղթել/AFJ
համաձայն/EM
համաձայնություն/ACDFHM
համան/ABDG
համաչափություն/ABCDFHM
համապատասխանություն/ABCDFHM
համարել/FJL
համարձակ/M
համեստ/M
հայացք/ACFH
հայթայթել/AJ
հայհոյանք/ACDFH
հայտնել/FJL
հան/ADEHN
հանգստանում/M
հանգստացրանք/M
հանեմ/L
հաշտություն/ACDFHM
հաջորդություն/ACDFH
հասան/ADGL
հասանեմ/M
հասունացած/L
հաստատություն/ACDFH
հավակնություն/ACDFH
հավանականություն/ACDFHM
հավասարակշռություն/ACDFH
հավաստիացնել/J
հատակ/ADEGHM
հարգանք/ACDF
հարգել/DJL
հարսանիք/ABDGH
հարցեր/ABDEFGH
հաց/N
հեղափոխություն/ACDFH
հեշտություն/ACDFH
հեռագրություն/ACDFH
հեռանկար/ACDEM
հետադիմել/J
հետամնացություն/ACDFH
հյուսնություն/ACDFH
հյուրանոց/DE
հյուրասեր/M
հնազանդվել/FJL
հնարավորություն/ABCDFH
հնձեց/DG
հնձող/AH
հնչեղություն/ACDFH
հոգս/N
հողատարածք/ABFG
հողմահարվել/J
հովա/BC
հրաժեշտ/DM
հրաման/ABCDFGH
հրամանատար/ABCDG
հրուշակ/D
հօրեղբօր/A
ձգտումցանկություն/ACDFH
ձեն/N
ձեռնարկ/ACDE
ձերբակալել/AFJ
ղավթի/B
ղարաբաղ/DEGH
ճահիճ/CF
ճամփորդ/BCDG
ճաշ/N
ճարպիկություն/A
ճկունություն/ACDFHM
ճնշել/AFJ
մակագրություն/ACDFH
մահապարտ/CD
մահկանացու/BDG
մահճաբուժություն/ACDFH
մայր/N
մանկան/AB
մանկանալ/AD
մանկություն/ACDFH
մատյան/E
մատուցեցիր/L
մարդ/ABEFIJNO
մարդամոտ/M
մաքաթի/DG
մգանալ/AD
մեխել/J
մեծ/ABDGH
մեծամեծ/C
մեծություն/ACDFH
մեղադրել/DFJ
մեղապարտ/DGM
մեղքա/B
մեղքեր/N
միջագետք/ABDEFGH
միջնաբերդ/ABDEFGH
մխիթարել/FJ
մնաս/ADGL
մշտականություն/ACDFH
մոգություն/ACDFH
մոլորություն/ACDFH
մոլություն/ACDFH
մորե/B
մուշեղ/ABDG
մուր/N
մտամոլություն/ACDFH
նախ/N
նախադեպ/M
նախանշել/J
նախորդ/ACDEGH
նահանջ/ADEF
նասիբ/G
նավեր/DF
նեխածություն/ACDFH
նետել/AFJ
ներգործող/L
ներկայացուցչի/B
ներքև/ADH
նկատել/DFJL
նոյ/ABDG
նպաստ/ADEGM
նվազեցման/A
նվազություն/ACDFH
նրան/ABEFH
նրբանկատություն/ACDFHM
շագանակ/D
շահագործող/C
շարանել/J
շարժունություն/ACDFHM
շարունակվեց/G
շեմերի/B
շնորհապարտ/M
շշուկ/AF
շորեր/ABDFGH
շուրջ/N
շրջափակ/E
ողորկել/J
ողորմած/BDL
ոչնչություն/ACDFH
ոսկեփոխություն/ACDFH
ոստիկան/ABCDG
որձատություն/ACDFH
որմի/B
որոշել/FJ
ուզած/N
ուժաբանություն/ACDFH
ուղղակի/M
ունեցած/ABDFGHL
ուշացնությամբ/M
ուսմունք/ADFG
չարագործ/ABCDG
չարացնել/J
չափ/ABDFGH
չափավորություն/ACDFHM
չափել/DFJ
չդրի/B
պակաս/ADEHM
պահակազօրք/A
պահանջ/ABCDEF
պահեցինք/L
պատասխան/ABCDEFGM
պատասխանել/FJ
պատեհություն/ACDFHM
պատեր/ABDFGH
պատկան/DEG
պատճառել/AFJ
պատմուճան/N
պատրաստ/DEGM
պարբերական/D
պարեր/ADF
պարտավորություն/ACDFH
պետերբուրգ/E
պիտանիություն/ACDFHM
պղծի/L
ՊՆ/NOSUGGEST
պնդել/AFJ
պտուղ/ABCDM
ջերմ/ADFG
ջորի/BC
ջուր/N
ջրատարողություն/ACDFH
ռազմ/D
սագեր/ADG
սաղարթավորել/J
սայիս/A
սառածություն/ACDFH
սառնասրտություն/ACDFH
սասմա/B
սատակ/DE
սարսափել/DFJ
սեպուհ/D
սիրահարվել/AJ
սիրտ/N
սկզբունք/ABCDFGM
սղալել/J
սմբատ/ABDG
սպառնալ/ADFH
սպառնաց/L
սպաս/CDEG
սսեցի/CD
ստանալ/ABDF
ստեղծագործություն/ABCDFH
ստիպ/DE
սրբավայրերից/NO
սրբացրել/J
վակաս/ABCDGH
վաղարշ/ADGH
վանել/FJM
վաստակել/FJ
վարար/E
վարդապետություն/ACDFH
վարժեցում/A
վարձեց/DGL
վարսավիր/C
վարսեր/N
վեր/ABDGH
վերագրել/AFJ
վիճարկվել/J
վիրահատություն/ACDFH
վկայ/BDEH
վկայական/AD
վտանգ/ABCDFGHM
վրայ/DFH
վրի/N
տալ/ABFIJN
տակառապետ/ABDG
տանես/L
տաշեղ/AC
տար/DEFG
տարած/DE
տարաձայնություն/ACDFH
տարվել/FJL
տեղաբաշխում/A
տեսիլք/N
տեսք/ABDFGH
տերիտորիա/BC
տիրույթ/CE
տոհմ/ABDEGH
տոհմեր/ABDFGH
տող/FG
տուն/N
տունկեր/AD
տրոհել/J
տրտմեց/DGL
ցանամ/M
ցուցադրում/AB
ցուցամոլություն/ACDFH
փակվել/J
փառաբանություն/ACDFH
փառահեղություն/ACDFH
փեշեր/AD
փնտրել/JV
փոգոր/D
փոխանակ/E
փորձեր/ADFG
փոքրացրել/J
փրաասպա/B
փրկել/AFJ
քաղ/DEH
քաղաք/ABCDEFGHNO
քան/DEN
քաշել/AFJL
քաջություն/ACDFH
քն/DEFH
քննարկում/ABCH
քորել/FJ
քուր/N
օբդիաս/A
օբյեկտիվություն/ACDFH
օգտագործող/DG
օգտավետ/M
օր/ABDEFGH
օրհնի/B
